Utah statutes.
53A-13-111.   Educational program on the use of information technology.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall provide for an educational program on the use of information technology, which shall be offered by high schools.

(2)  An educational program on the use of information technology shall:

(a)  provide instruction on skills and competencies essential for the workplace and requested by employers;

(b)  include the following components:

(i)  a curriculum;

(ii)  online access to the curriculum;

(iii)  instructional software for classroom and student use;

(iv)  certification of skills and competencies most frequently requested by employers;

(v)  professional development for teachers; and

(vi)  deployment and program support, including integration with existing curriculum standards; and

(c)  be made available to high school students, faculty, and staff.

